Washington statutes.
RCW 10.01.130

Witnesses' fees.

No fees shall be allowed to witnesses in criminal causes unless they shall have reported their attendance at the close of each day's session to the clerk in attendance thereon.

[ 1895 c 10 s 1; RRS s 498, part. FORMER PART OF SECTION: 1895 c 10 s 2; RRS s 498, part, now codified as RCW 10.01.140.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Cf. CrR 6.12.

Witness fees: Chapters 2.40, 12.16 RCW.